Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.070

Election to ascertain exclusive bargaining representative, when—Runoff election—Decertification election.

(1) Any employee organization may file a request with the commission for recognition as the exclusive representative. Such request shall allege that a majority of the employees in an appropriate collective bargaining unit wish to be represented for the purpose of collective bargaining by such organization, shall describe the grouping of jobs or positions which constitute the unit claimed to be appropriate, shall be supported by credible evidence demonstrating that at least thirty percent of the employees in the appropriate unit desire the organization requesting recognition as their exclusive representative, and shall indicate the name, address, and telephone number of any other interested employee organization, if known to the requesting organization.

(2) The commission shall determine the exclusive representative by conducting an election by secret ballot, except under the following circumstances:

(a) In instances where a serious unfair labor practice has been committed which interfered with the election process and precluded the holding of a fair election, the commission shall determine the exclusive bargaining representative by an examination of organization membership rolls or a comparison of signatures on organization bargaining authorization cards.

(b) In instances where there is then in effect a lawful written collective bargaining agreement between the employer and another employee organization covering any employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition, the request for recognition shall not be entertained unless it shall be filed within the time limits prescribed in subsection (3) of this section for decertification or a new recognition election.

(c) In instances where within the previous twelve months another employee organization has been lawfully recognized or certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of any employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition, the request for recognition shall not be entertained.

(d) In instances where the commission has within the previous twelve months conducted a secret ballot election involving any employees included in the unit described in the request for recognition in which a majority of the valid ballots cast chose not to be represented by any employee organization, the request for recognition shall not be entertained.

(3) Whenever the commission conducts an election to ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative, the ballot shall contain the name of the proposed bargaining representative and of any other bargaining representative showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of the educational employees within the unit, together with a choice for any educational employee to designate that he or she does not desire to be represented by any bargaining agent. Where more than one organization is on the ballot and neither of the three or more choices receives a majority of the valid ballots cast by the educational employees within the bargaining unit, a runoff election shall be held. The runoff ballot shall contain the two choices which receive the largest and second largest number of votes. No question concerning representation may be raised within one year of a certification or attempted certification. Where there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of representation may be raised except during the period not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the expiration date of the agreement. In the event that a valid collective bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or extensions thereof, has been or will be in existence for three years, then the question of representation may be raised not more than ninety nor less than sixty days prior to the third anniversary date of the agreement or any renewals or extensions thereof as long as such renewals and extensions do not exceed three years; and if the exclusive bargaining representative is removed as a result of such procedure, the then existing collective bargaining agreement shall be terminable by the new exclusive bargaining representative so selected within sixty days after its certification or terminated on its expiration date, whichever is sooner, or if no exclusive bargaining representative is so selected, then the agreement shall be deemed to be terminated at its expiration date or as of such third anniversary date, whichever is sooner.

(4) Within the time limits prescribed in subsection (3) of this section, a petition may be filed signed by at least thirty percent of the employees of a collective bargaining unit, then represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, alleging that a majority of the employees in that unit do not wish to be represented by an employee organization, requesting that the exclusive bargaining representative be decertified, and indicating the name, address and telephone number of the exclusive bargaining representative and any other interested employee organization, if known. Upon the verification of the signatures on the petition, the commission shall conduct an election by secret ballot as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 8.]